Washington statutes.
RCW 41.50.050

Powers, duties, and functions of director.

The director shall:

(1) Have the authority to organize the department into not more than four divisions, each headed by an assistant director;

(2) Have free access to all files and records of various funds assigned to the department and inspect and audit the files and records as deemed necessary;

(3) Employ personnel to carry out the general administration of the department;

(4) Submit an annual written report of the activities of the department to the governor and the chairs of the appropriate legislative committees with one copy to the staff of each of the committees, including recommendations for statutory changes the director believes to be desirable;

(5) Adopt such rules and regulations as are necessary to carry out the powers, duties, and functions of the department pursuant to the provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW.

[ 1995 c 239 s 317; 1993 c 61 s 1; 1987 c 505 s 24; 1981 c 3 s 33; 1977 ex.s. c 251 s 1; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 105 s 7.]

NOTES:

Intent—Purpose—1995 c 239: See note following RCW 41.32.831.

Effective date—Part and subchapter headings not law—1995 c 239: See notes following RCW 41.32.005.

Effective dates—Severability—1981 c 3: See notes following RCW 43.33A.010.

Benefits not contractual right until date specified: RCW 41.34.100.